Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
350

CHILD
ABUSE

Section

350-1 Definitions

350-1.1 Reports

350-1.15 Orientation and training

350-1.2 Nonreporting; penalty

350-1.3 Any person may report

350-1.4 Confidentiality

350-1.5 Authorization for color photographs,
x-rays, and

radiological or other diagnostic
examination

350-1.6 Disclosure of records

350-2 Action on reporting

350-3 Immunity from liability

350-4 Repealed

350-5 Admissibility of evidence

350-6, 7 Repealed

Cross References

Hawaii children's trust fund, see chapter 350B.

Case Notes

Hawaii legislature did not intend to create a duty that would
subject a private party (and analogously the government) to tort liability
based upon a failure to report in violation of this chapter. 711 F. Supp. 2d
1195 (2010).

Nothing in this chapter prevents the issuance of a search
warrant based on information obtained by the department or the police while
investigating an abuse case. 70 H. 627, 780 P.2d 1103 (1989).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next